Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska52-1102
Lien; perfection; financing statement; filing; fee.

A lien created under section 52-1101 shall be perfected as provided in article 9, Uniform Commercial Code. Any financing statement filed to perfect such lien shall contain or have attached thereto (1) the name and address and the social security number or federal tax identification number, if known, of the person to whom any product, machinery, or equipment was furnished or for whom work or labor was performed, (2) the name and address and the social security number or federal tax identification number of the person claiming the lien, (3) the last date upon which such product, machinery, or equipment was furnished or work or labor was performed under the contract, and (4) the amount due for the product, machinery, or equipment furnished or work or labor performed. The failure to include the social security number or federal tax identification number shall not render any filing unperfected. At the time the lien is filed, the lienholder shall send a copy to the person to whom the product, machinery, or equipment was furnished or for whom the work or labor was performed. The fee for filing, amending, or releasing such lien shall be the same as set forth in section 9-525, Uniform Commercial Code.

Laws 1977, LB 218, § 2;

Laws 1984, LB 808, § 6;

Laws 1988, LB 943, § 9;

Laws 1998, LB 1321, § 88;

Laws 1999, LB 550, § 26;

Laws 2001, LB 54, § 15.